Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-2102
Director of Agriculture; agent.

The State of Nebraska hereby designates the Director of Agriculture as the sole agent to represent the State of Nebraska in the administration of any funds made available under the provisions of the federal act specified in section 2-2101.

Laws 1951, c. 4, § 2, p. 65.